New York, session 2025-2026, S8736.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that access to 2 gas, electric, and steam service is essential to the health, safety, and 3 general welfare of residents and businesses of the state. The legisla- 4 ture further finds that regulated utilities and public authorities have 5 used replevin actions pursuant to article 71 of the civil practice law 6 and rules to seize utility meters as a means of terminating service, 7 including through orders of seizure that authorize law enforcement to 8 enter premises. The legislature determines that the seizure of utility 9 meters and the termination of essential utility service through such 10 actions is contrary to the public interest and undermines existing util- 11 ity consumer protections. It is therefore the intent of the legislature 12 to prohibit the use of replevin actions to seize utility meters and to 13 prevent the termination of utility service pursuant to section 7101 of 14 the civil practice law and rules. 15 § 2. Section 7101 of the civil practice law and rules is amended to 16 read as follows: 17 § 7101. When action may be brought. (a) An action under this article 18 may be brought to try the right to possession of a chattel. 19 (b) This article shall not apply to the provision of any part of the 20 gas, electric or steam service provided to any residential customer or 21 non-residential customer by any gas, electric or steam corporation or 22 municipality, including the Long Island power authority. It is hereby 23 declared to be the policy of this state that the continued provision of 24 all or any part of such gas, electric and steam service to all residen- 25 tial and non-residential customers without unreasonable qualifications 26 or lengthy delays is necessary for the preservation of the health and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14369-01-6 S. 8736 2 1 general welfare and is in the public interest. The seizure of electric, 2 gas, or steam meters is against the public interest. 3 § 3. Section 32 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 7 to read as follows: 5 7. Utility service shall not be terminated for any residential elec- 6 tric or gas service to a residence pursuant to section seventy-one 7 hundred one of the civil practice law and rules. 8 § 4. Title 1-A of article 5 of the public authorities law, as added by 9 chapter 517 of the laws of 1986, is amended by adding a new section 10 1020-nn to read as follows: 11 § 1020-nn. Utility service. Utility service shall not be terminated 12 for any residential customer or non-residential customer pursuant to 13 section seventy-one hundred one of the civil practice law and rules. 14 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.